Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Defense of Unclean Hands [Repealed]

16-1-201. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 908, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 1, effective February 23, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-1-201 — 16-1-206 concerned the defense of unclean hands.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent of the act to repeal the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands, codified in title 16, chapter 1, part 2. It is the further legislative intent, consistent with the original enactment's intent, that the common law equitable doctrine shall remain in full force and effect, unchanged and unadulterated, by the original enactment or this repeal.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 3 provided that any person affected by the repeal of the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands having a claim arising out of any act or omission resulting from such codification shall bring suit in chancery or circuit court alleging such claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim not later than one year after February 23, 2012, or forever be barred from asserting such claim under title 16, chapter 1, part 2, as a claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim. The limitation of this section shall not affect any claim or defense or application of any other equitable doctrine arising under the common law.

16-1-202. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 908, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 1, effective February 23, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-1-201 — 16-1-206 concerned the defense of unclean hands.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent of the act to repeal the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands, codified in title 16, chapter 1, part 2. It is the further legislative intent, consistent with the original enactment's intent, that the common law equitable doctrine shall remain in full force and effect, unchanged and unadulterated, by the original enactment or this repeal.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 3 provided that any person affected by the repeal of the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands having a claim arising out of any act or omission resulting from such codification shall bring suit in chancery or circuit court alleging such claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim not later than one year after February 23, 2012, or forever be barred from asserting such claim under title 16, chapter 1, part 2, as a claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim. The limitation of this section shall not affect any claim or defense or application of any other equitable doctrine arising under the common law.

16-1-203. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 908, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 1, effective February 23, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-1-201 — 16-1-206 concerned the defense of unclean hands.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent of the act to repeal the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands, codified in title 16, chapter 1, part 2. It is the further legislative intent, consistent with the original enactment's intent, that the common law equitable doctrine shall remain in full force and effect, unchanged and unadulterated, by the original enactment or this repeal.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 3 provided that any person affected by the repeal of the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands having a claim arising out of any act or omission resulting from such codification shall bring suit in chancery or circuit court alleging such claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim not later than one year after February 23, 2012, or forever be barred from asserting such claim under title 16, chapter 1, part 2, as a claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim. The limitation of this section shall not affect any claim or defense or application of any other equitable doctrine arising under the common law.

16-1-204. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 908, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 1, effective February 23, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-1-201 — 16-1-206 concerned the defense of unclean hands.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent of the act to repeal the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands, codified in title 16, chapter 1, part 2. It is the further legislative intent, consistent with the original enactment's intent, that the common law equitable doctrine shall remain in full force and effect, unchanged and unadulterated, by the original enactment or this repeal.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 3 provided that any person affected by the repeal of the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands having a claim arising out of any act or omission resulting from such codification shall bring suit in chancery or circuit court alleging such claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim not later than one year after February 23, 2012, or forever be barred from asserting such claim under title 16, chapter 1, part 2, as a claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim. The limitation of this section shall not affect any claim or defense or application of any other equitable doctrine arising under the common law.

16-1-205. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 908, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 1, effective February 23, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-1-201 — 16-1-206 concerned the defense of unclean hands.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent of the act to repeal the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands, codified in title 16, chapter 1, part 2. It is the further legislative intent, consistent with the original enactment's intent, that the common law equitable doctrine shall remain in full force and effect, unchanged and unadulterated, by the original enactment or this repeal.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 3 provided that any person affected by the repeal of the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands having a claim arising out of any act or omission resulting from such codification shall bring suit in chancery or circuit court alleging such claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim not later than one year after February 23, 2012, or forever be barred from asserting such claim under title 16, chapter 1, part 2, as a claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim. The limitation of this section shall not affect any claim or defense or application of any other equitable doctrine arising under the common law.

16-1-206. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 908, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 1, effective February 23, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-1-201 — 16-1-206 concerned the defense of unclean hands.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent of the act to repeal the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands, codified in title 16, chapter 1, part 2. It is the further legislative intent, consistent with the original enactment's intent, that the common law equitable doctrine shall remain in full force and effect, unchanged and unadulterated, by the original enactment or this repeal.

Acts 2012, ch. 518, § 3 provided that any person affected by the repeal of the statutory codification of the equitable defense of unclean hands having a claim arising out of any act or omission resulting from such codification shall bring suit in chancery or circuit court alleging such claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim not later than one year after February 23, 2012, or forever be barred from asserting such claim under title 16, chapter 1, part 2, as a claim, counterclaim, or defense to a claim. The limitation of this section shall not affect any claim or defense or application of any other equitable doctrine arising under the common law.